Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.640

First-class districts containing more than one former first-class district—Number and terms of directors.

Upon the establishment of a new school district of the first class as provided for in RCW 28A.343.020 containing more than one former first-class district, the directors of the largest former first-class district and three directors representative of the other former first-class districts selected by a majority of the board members of the former first-class districts and two directors representative of former second-class districts selected by a majority of the board members of former second-class districts shall meet at the call of the educational service district superintendent and shall constitute the board of directors of the new district. Vacancies once such a board has been reconstituted shall not be filled unless the number of remaining board members is less than seven, and such vacancies shall be filled in the manner otherwise provided by law.

Each board of directors so constituted shall proceed at once to organize in the manner prescribed by law and thereafter shall have all of the powers and authority conferred by law upon boards of first-class districts until the next regular school election and until their successors are elected and qualified. At such election other than districts electing directors for six-year terms as provided in RCW 29A.04.340, five directors shall be elected either at large or by director districts, as the case may be, two for a term of two years and three for a term of four years. At such election for districts electing directors for six years other than a district having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more and electing directors for six year terms, five directors shall be elected either at large or by director districts, as the case may be, one for a term of two years, two for a term of four years, and two for a term of six years.

[ 2009 c 107 s 3; 1991 c 363 s 26; 1990 c 33 s 322; 1980 c 35 s 5; 1980 c 47 s 2. Prior: 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 7; prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 104; 1975 c 43 s 11; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 10; 1973 c 19 s 1; 1971 c 67 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.315.620, 28A.57.357.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2009 c 107 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Effective date—2009 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1980 c 35: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Severability—1980 c 47: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.